Indiana, session 2026, HB1186.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-2-83, AS AMENDED BY P.L.136-2018,
SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 83. (a) As used in this section, "affiliate"
has the meaning set forth in IC 23-1-43-1. The term includes a
parent company or a subsidiary.
(b) As used in this section, "prohibited person" means either of
the following:
(1) A private equity firm or an affiliate of a private equity
firm.
(2) A prohibited person (as defined in IC 1-1-16-6).
(a) (c) No public utility, as defined in section 1 of this chapter, shall
sell, assign, transfer, lease, or encumber its franchise, works, or system
to any other person, partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation, or contract for the operation of any part of its works or
system by any other person, partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation, without the approval of the commission after hearing,
subject to subsection (g). And no such public utility, except
2026 IN 1186—LS 6418/DI 101


temporarily or in case of emergency and for a period of not exceeding
thirty (30) days, shall make any special contract at rates other than
those prescribed in its schedule of rates theretofore filed with the
commission, and in force, with any other utility for rendering any
service to or procuring any service from such other utility, without the
approval of the commission. It shall be lawful, however, for any utility
to make a contract for service to or from another utility at rates
previously filed with and approved by the commission and in force.
(b) (d) The approval of the commission of the sale, assignment,
transfer, lease, or encumbrance of a franchise or any part of a franchise
under this section shall not revive or validate any lapsed or invalid
franchise, or enlarge or add to the powers and privileges contained in
the grant of any franchise or waive any forfeiture. No such public
utility shall directly or indirectly purchase, acquire, or become the
owner of any of the property, stock, or bonds of any other public utility
authorized to engage or engaged in the same or a similar business, or
operating or purporting to operate under a franchise from the same or
any other municipality or under an indeterminate permit unless
authorized so to do by the commission.
(c) (e) Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the holding of
stock lawfully acquired before May 1, 1913, or prohibit, upon the
surrender or exchange of said stock pursuant to a reorganization plan,
the purchase, acquisition, taking, or holding by the owner of a
proportionate amount of the stock of any new corporation organized to
take over at foreclosure or other sale, the property of the corporation
whose stock has been thus surrendered or exchanged.
(d) (f) Every contract by any public utility for the purchase,
acquisition, assignment, or transfer to it of any of the stock of any other
public utility by or through any person, partnership, limited liability
company, or corporation without the approval of the commission shall
be void and of no effect, and no such transfer or assignment of such
stock upon the books of the corporation pursuant to any such contract
shall be effective for any purpose.
(g) After February 27, 2026, a public utility may not:
(1) sell, assign, transfer, lease, or encumber all or any part of
the public utility's:
(A) franchise, works, or system;
(B) used and useful property, plant, or business; or
(C) real or personal estate not used and useful in the
service provided by the public utility; or
(2) sell, assign, or transfer any shares of the public utility's
stock;
2026 IN 1186—LS 6418/DI 101


to a prohibited person. The commission may not approve a
transaction described in this subsection, and any contract for a
transaction described in this subsection is void.
(h) Subsection (g) does not prohibit:
(1) the holding of a public utility's stock that is lawfully
acquired before February 28, 2026; or
(2) a transaction described in subsection (g) that is lawfully
consummated before February 28, 2026.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1186—LS 6418/DI 101